Louisiana, session 2026, SB364.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 45:302(A) and 1163(A)(1) and (C) are hereby amended and reenacted
to read as follows:
§302. Powers of the commission; scope
A. The commission shall supervise, govern, regulate and control the
transportation or sale of natural gas moving by pipeline to local distributing systems
for resale for the purpose of fixing and regulating the fair and equitable rates
charged and the service furnished by such public utilities in connection with such
transportation or sale.
* * *
§1163. Power to regulate rates and service; exceptions
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-595 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 364
A.(1) The commission shall exercise all necessary power and authority over
any street railway, gas, electric light, heat, power, waterworks, or other local public
utility for the purpose of fixing and regulating the fair and equitable rates charged
or to be charged by and service furnished by such public utilities.
* * *
C. To ensure that costs passed through to consumers are just and reasonable
fair and equitable, the commission shall, no less frequently than every other year,
audit the adjustment clause filings submitted by a public electric utility in this state,
exercise its authorized review and determination of such filings, and exercise its
control and rate-fixing authority to modify fuel adjustment charges of an electric
utility as assessed by an electric utility to rate-paying consumers through operation
of the utility's fuel adjustment clause.